Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse.

Sec. 44.29.100.
Advisory board on alcoholism and drug abuse.

There is established in the Department of Health and Social Services an advisory board on alcoholism and drug abuse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 198 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71, § 2 (1988); am § 18 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1993)

Sec. 44.29.110.
Composition.

The board consists of 15 members, 14 of whom are public members appointed by the governor, and the 15th who is the commissioner of health and social services ex officio.

History.

(§ 1 ch 198 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71, § 3 (1988); am § 19 ch 66 SLA 1991; am E.O. No. 108, § 5 (2003))

Sec. 44.29.115.
Qualifications of board members.

The governor shall appoint the 14 public members so that the board consists of the following public members:

one member who is licensed to practice medicine in the state;

one member who is admitted to practice law in the state;

four members who are chronic alcoholics with psychoses who are recovering;

three members who are substance abuse treatment professionals who represent public and private providers of substance abuse prevention and treatment services; and

five members who have shown an interest in the problems of alcoholism or drug abuse and who have knowledge of the social problems associated with alcoholism or drug abuse.

History.

(E.O. No. 71, § 4 (1988); § 20 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 44.29.120.
Term of office.

The governor shall appoint the public members of the board for staggered terms of four years.

The governor shall fill a vacancy of a public member on the board by appointment for the unexpired part of the vacated term.

Public members of the board serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall replace a public member who by poor attendance or lack of contribution to the board’s work demonstrates ineffectiveness as a board member. In this subsection, “poor attendance” means the failure to attend three or more consecutive meetings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 198 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71, § 5 (1988); § 21 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 44.29.130.
Compensation, per diem, and expenses.

The public members of the board are not entitled to a salary, but are entitled to per diem, reimbursement for travel, and other expenses authorized by law for other boards.

History.

(§ 1 ch 198 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71, § 6 (1988); am § 22 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 44.29.135.
Officers and staff.

The board, by a majority of its membership, shall annually elect a presiding officer and other officers it considers necessary from among its membership.

The board shall have a paid staff provided by the department, including an executive director who shall be selected by the board. The executive director is in the partially exempt service and may hire additional employees in the classified service of the state. The department shall provide for the assignment of personnel to the board to ensure the board has the capacity to fulfill its responsibilities. The executive director of the board shall be directly responsible to the board in the performance of the director’s duty.

History.

(§ 23 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 44.29.140.
Duties.

The board shall

act in an advisory capacity to the legislature, the governor, and state agencies in the following matters:

special problems affecting mental health that alcoholism or drug abuse may present;

educational research and public informational activities in respect to the problems presented by alcoholism or drug abuse;

social problems that affect rehabilitation of alcoholics and drug abusers;

legal processes that affect the treatment and rehabilitation of alcoholics and drug abusers;

development of programs of prevention, treatment, and rehabilitation for alcoholics and drug abusers; and

evaluation of effectiveness of alcoholism and drug abuse programs in the state;

provide to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority for its review and consideration recommendations concerning the integrated comprehensive mental health program for the people who are described in AS

47.30.056(b)(3)

, and concerning the use of money in the mental health trust settlement income account in a manner consistent with regulations adopted under AS

47.30.031

.

The board is the planning and coordinating body for purposes of federal and state laws relating to alcohol, drug, and other substance abuse prevention and treatment services.

The board shall prepare and maintain a comprehensive plan of services

for the prevention and treatment of alcohol, drug, and other substance abuse; and

for persons described in AS

47.30.056(b)(3)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 198 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71, § 7 (1988); am §§ 24, 25 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 21 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (a)(2) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Sec. 44.29.150.
Drug abuse program coordinator.

[Repealed, E.O. No. 71, § 23 (1988).]

Sec. 44.29.200.
Definition.

In AS

44.29.100

—

44.29.200

, “board” means the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse.

History.

(E.O. No. 71, § 8 (1988))